Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the  biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the Oregon Health
Authority are changed by the amounts specified:
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Programs
General Fund Ch. 545 1(1) +$3,353,140
Other funds Ch. 545 2(1) +$10,156,765
Federal funds Ch. 545 4(1) +$125,409,493
Health Care for All Oregon
Children program
General Fund Ch. 652 4 -$7,004,243
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 3, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 2